Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Chapter 17. Temporary Assistance to Needy Families
§ 43-17-6.
Written screening questionnaire for certain adult applicants for TANF benefits; purpose; drug test; substance use disorder treatment plan; termination of cash assistance.

As used in this section:

“Adult” means a person who is eighteen (18) years of age or older.

“Department” means the Department of Human Services.

“Drug” means a controlled substance, as defined in Section 41-29-105, for which a person does not have a valid prescription.

“Drug test” means a chemical test administered for the purpose of determining the presence or absence of a drug or metabolites in a person’s body fluids.

Adult applicants for Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) benefits in the assistance unit who otherwise qualify for cash assistance under the TANF program shall be required to complete a written screening questionnaire designed to determine the likelihood of the person having a substance use disorder.

If the results of the written screening questionnaire indicate a reasonable likelihood that an adult recipient may have a substance use disorder involving the misuse of a drug, the department shall require the person to submit to a drug test at the department’s expense in order to continue to receive cash assistance under the TANF program.

If an adult recipient refuses to take the required drug test, the department shall terminate cash assistance for the person and the person may not reapply for cash assistance for:

Ninety (90) days after a first refusal to take a drug test within one (1) year; or

One (1) year after a second refusal to take a drug test within one (1) year.

A drug test shall be administered with due regard to the privacy and dignity of the person being tested.

Before taking a drug test, an adult recipient may advise the person administering the test regarding any prescription or over-the-counter medication that the person is taking.

The result of a drug test is a private record and disclosure to a third party is prohibited.

If an adult recipient tests negative for the unlawful use of a drug after taking a drug test, the person remains eligible for cash assistance, subject to the other TANF eligibility requirements.

If an adult recipient tests positive for the unlawful use of a drug after taking a drug test, the person:

Shall be given a list of approved substance use disorder treatment providers that are available in the area in which the person resides; and

May continue to receive benefits if the person enters into and follows the requirements of a substance use disorder treatment plan, including:

1. In each later drug test required by department rule during treatment; and

2. In an additional drug test given at the conclusion of treatment; and

Receiving treatment from an approved substance use disorder treatment provider for at least sixty (60) days;

Testing negative for the unlawful use of a drug:

Meeting the other TANF requirements for receiving cash assistance.

If an adult recipient declines to enter into a substance use disorder treatment plan, or if the recipient enters into but fails to meet a requirement of a substance use disorder treatment plan, including if the person refuses to take a drug test required by a substance use disorder treatment plan or tests positive for the unlawful use of a drug in a drug test required by a substance use disorder treatment plan, the department shall terminate cash assistance for the person and the person may not reapply for cash assistance for:

Ninety (90) days after the day on which the department determines that the person is no longer eligible for cash assistance; or

One (1) year after the day on which the department determines that the person is no longer eligible for cash assistance, if the department has previously determined on at least one (1) other occasion in the past year that the person is no longer eligible for cash assistance.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 430, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 43-17-7.
Duties of State Department of Human Services.

The State Department shall:

Supervise the administration of the Temporary Assistance to Needy Families (TANF) program under this chapter by the county departments;

Make such rules and regulations and take such action as may be necessary or desirable for carrying out the provisions of this chapter. All rules and regulations made by the state department shall be binding on the counties and shall be complied with by the respective county departments;

Prescribe the form of, and print and supply to the county departments such forms as it may deem necessary and advisable;

Cooperate with the federal government in matters of mutual concern pertaining to the TANF program;

Make such reports in such form and containing such information as the federal government may from time to time require, and comply with such provisions as the federal government may from time to time find necessary to assure the correctness and verification of such reports;

Publish an annual report and such interim reports as may be necessary;

Establish rules and regulations restricting the use or disclosure of information, records, papers, files and communications concerning applicants and recipients to purposes directly connected with the administration of the TANF program, in compliance with federal law;

When the state agency has reason to believe that the home in which a relative and child receiving TANF assistance reside is unsuitable for the child because of the neglect, abuse or exploitation of such child, the state department shall bring such condition to the attention of the appropriate court or law enforcement agencies, and provide such data with respect to the situation as the department may have;

As required by federal law, to provide for the development and implementation of a program under which the department will undertake, in the case of a child born out of wedlock who is receiving TANF assistance authorized herein, to establish the paternity of such child and secure support for him; and, in the case of any child receiving TANF assistance from the department who has been deserted or abandoned by his parent, to secure support for such child from such parent (or from any other person legally liable for such support), utilizing any reciprocal arrangements adopted with other states to obtain or enforce court orders for support;

Provide for entering into cooperative arrangements with appropriate courts and law enforcement officials to assist the department in administering the program referred to in paragraph (i), including the entering into of financial arrangements with such courts and officials in order to assure optimum results under such program, and with respect to any other matters of common concern to such courts or officials in the department.

The Department of Human Services shall include the following agencies currently providing services to TANF and food stamp recipients in any planning activities with respect thereto, and those agencies shall cooperate with the department and provide information as necessary in order to ensure the full utilization of all economic assistance programs: the State Department of Mental Health, the State Department of Rehabilitation Services, the Mississippi Department of Corrections, the Mississippi Department of Transportation, the State Department of Public Safety, the Division of Medicaid, the State Department of Health and the State Department of Education.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7174; Laws, 1940, ch. 294; Laws, 1968, ch. 562, § 4; Laws, 1997, ch. 316, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 12, 1997).

§ 43-17-9.
Duties of county departments.

The county departments shall:

Administer the provisions of this chapter relating to the TANF program in the respective counties subject to the rules and regulations prescribed by the state department pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

Report to the state department at such times and in such manner and form as the state department may from time to time direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7175; Laws, 1940, ch. 294; Laws, 1997, ch. 316, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 12, 1997).

§ 43-17-11.
Application for assistance.

Application for TANF assistance under this chapter shall be made to the county department of the county in which the dependent child resides. The application shall be in writing or reduced to writing in the manner and upon the form prescribed by the state department. Such application shall be made by the person with whom the child is living and shall contain information as to the age and residence of the child and such other information as may be required by the rules and regulations of the state department. One (1) application may be made for several children of the same family if they reside with the same person.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7176; Laws, 1940, ch. 294; Laws, 1997, ch. 316, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved March 12, 1997).

§ 43-17-13.
Investigation of applications.

Whenever a county department receives a notification of the dependency of a child or an application for TANF assistance, an investigation and record shall promptly be made of the circumstances in order to ascertain the dependency of the child and the facts supporting the application and in order to obtain such other information as may be required by the rules of the state department.

The investigation may include a visit to the home of the child and/or the person with whom the child will live during the time TANF assistance is granted.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7177; Laws, 1940, ch. 294; Laws, 1987, ch. 326, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 316, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved March 12, 1997).

§ 43-17-15.
Granting of assistance.

Upon the completion of such investigation the county department shall decide whether the child is eligible for TANF assistance under the provisions of this chapter, and determine in accordance with the rules and regulations of the state department the amount of such assistance and the date on which such assistance shall begin. The county department shall notify the applicant of its decision.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7178; Laws, 1940, ch. 294; Laws, 1997, ch. 316, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved March 12, 1997).

§ 43-17-17.
Appeal to the State Department of Human Services.

If an application is not acted upon by the county department within a reasonable time, not to exceed thirty (30) days, after the filing of the application, or is denied in whole or in part, or if any award of TANF assistance is modified or cancelled under any provision of this chapter, the applicant or recipient may appeal to the state department in the manner and form prescribed by the state department. The state department shall, upon receipt of such an appeal, give the applicant or recipient reasonable notice and opportunity for a fair hearing. The state department may also, upon its own motion, review any decision of a county department, and may consider any application upon which a decision has not been made by the county department within a reasonable time. The state department may make such additional investigation as it may deem necessary, and shall make such decision as to the granting of TANF assistance and the amount of assistance to be granted as in its opinion is justified and in conformity with the provisions of this chapter. Applicants or recipients affected by such decisions of the state department shall, upon request, be given reasonable notice and opportunity for a fair hearing by the state department.

All decisions of the state department shall be final and shall be binding upon the county involved and shall be complied with by the county department.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7179; Laws, 1940, ch. 294; Laws, 1997, ch. 316, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved March 12, 1997).

§ 43-17-19.
Periodic reconsideration and changes in amount of assistance.

All TANF assistance grants made under this chapter shall be reconsidered by the county department as frequently as may be required by the rules of the state department. After such further investigation as the county department may deem necessary or the state department may require, the amount of TANF assistance may be changed or TANF assistance may be entirely withdrawn if the state or county department finds that the child’s circumstances have altered sufficiently to warrant such action.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7180; Laws, 1940, ch. 294; Laws, 1997, ch. 316, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved March 12, 1997).

§ 43-17-21.
Removal to another county.

Any child qualified for and receiving TANF assistance pursuant to the provisions of this chapter in any county in this state who moves or is taken to another county in this state shall be entitled to receive TANF assistance in the county to which he has moved or is taken and the county department of the county from which he has moved shall transfer all necessary records relating to the child to the county department of the county to which he has moved.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7181; Laws, 1940, ch. 294; Laws, 1997, ch. 316, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved March 12, 1997).

§ 43-17-23.
Receipt and disposition of federal and other funds and manner of disbursing same.

Federal and other funds shall be received, disposed of and disbursed in the same manner as is provided for the handling of funds as is provided in Sections 43-9-33 through 43-9-37.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7182; Laws, 1940, ch. 294; Laws, 1997, ch. 316, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved March 12, 1997).

§ 43-17-25.
Fraudulent acts; penalties.

Whoever obtains, or attempts to obtain, or aids or abets any child to obtain by means of a willfully false statement or representation, or by impersonation or other fraudulent device:

TANF assistance to which the child is not entitled; or

TANF assistance greater than that to which he is justly entitled, shall be subject to the criminal penalties prescribed in Section 97-19-71; or shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than Twenty-five Hundred Dollars ($2500.00) or be imprisoned for not more than twelve (12) months, or both, in the discretion of the court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7183; Laws, 1940, ch. 294; Laws, 1997, ch. 316, § 13; Laws, 1998, ch. 324, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§§ 43-17-27 and 43-17-29.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1981, ch. 350, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§43-17-27. [Laws, 1962, ch. 560, §§ 4, 5]

§43-17-29. [Laws, 1952, ch. 387, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1958, ch. 535]

§ 43-17-31.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 316, § 27, eff from and after passage (approved March 12, 1997).

[Laws, 1990, ch. 356, § 1]

§ 43-17-33.
Entrepreneurial development; funding.

The Department of Human Services shall seek federal funds for entrepreneurial development so that recipients of Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) benefits can create jobs and provide incentives for TANF recipients in their efforts to attain self-sufficiency and independence. The TANF Implementation Council shall identify opportunities for entrepreneurial development for TANF recipients. In carrying out this program, the department shall work in conjunction with public, community and private sector entities including businesses, banks, and other institutions to develop strategies that provide training, technical assistance, planning, and research to TANF recipients in their efforts to own their own businesses. The TANF recipient must be enrolled in an allowable work activity to be considered for eligibility for the funds under this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 316, § 25, eff from and after passage (approved March 12, 1997).

§ 43-17-35.
Establishment of task force on out-of-wedlock pregnancies.

In the enactment of the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-193), the United States Congress made the following findings relating to out-of-wedlock pregnancies:

The increase of out-of-wedlock pregnancies and births is well documented.

An effective strategy to combat teenage pregnancy must address the issue of male responsibility, including statutory rape culpability and prevention. The increase of teenage pregnancies among the youngest girls is particularly severe and is linked to predatory sexual practices by men who are significantly older.

The negative consequences of an out-of-wedlock birth on the mother, the child, the family and society are well documented.

Currently thirty-five percent (35%) of children in single-parent homes are born out of wedlock, nearly the same percentage as that of children in single-parent homes whose parents are divorced. While many parents find themselves, through divorce or tragic circumstances beyond their control, facing the difficult task of raising children alone, nevertheless, the negative consequences of raising children in single-parent homes are well documented.

Therefore, in light of this demonstration of the crisis in our nation, it is the sense of the Congress that prevention of out-of-wedlock births are very important government interests and the policy contained in this legislation is intended to address the crisis.

The Department of Human Services shall establish a task force in compliance with Public Law 104-193, consisting of public and private organizations and individuals to review the incidence and circumstances of out-of-wedlock pregnancies in Mississippi. Based on these findings, goals will be established by the task force and a specific program will be recommended to prevent and reduce the incidence of out-of-wedlock pregnancies in Mississippi, as well as the efficiency and cost effectiveness of the program, with special emphasis on teenage pregnancies. The task force will establish numerical goals for reducing the illegitimacy ratio of the state as defined by federal law through calendar year 2005. The task force shall publish its findings and recommendations with any proposed legislation in a report to the Governor and the Legislature to be made on or before January 1, 1998.

The task force established under subsection (2) of this section shall continue in existence and shall study the effect that raising the statutory age of sexual consent to age sixteen (16) has on preventing and reducing the incidence of teenage out-of-wedlock pregnancies in Mississippi from July 1, 1998, to October 1, 2001. The task force shall consider whether raising the age of sexual consent to an age above age sixteen (16) would be more effective in preventing and reducing the incidence of teenage out-of-wedlock pregnancies in Mississippi. The task force shall publish its findings and recommendations, together with any proposed legislation, in a report to the Governor and the Legislature on or before January 1, 2002.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 316, § 24; Laws, 1998, ch. 549, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 406, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 43-17-37.
Repealed.

Repealed by its own terms by Laws, 2003, ch. 481, § 1, eff from and after December 31, 2005.

§43-17-37. [Laws, 1999, ch. 559, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 406, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 481, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2003.]

§ 43-17-39.
Repealed.

Repealed by its own terms effective July 1, 2006.

§43-17-39. [Laws, 2005, ch. 500, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2005.]